Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.040

Information available to victim.

(1) A person, financial information repository, financial service provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association possessing information relating to an actual or potential violation of this chapter, and who may have entered into a transaction, provided credit, products, goods, or services, accepted payment, or otherwise done business with a person who has used the victim's means of identification, must, upon written request of the victim, provide copies of all relevant application and transaction information related to the transaction being alleged as a potential or actual violation of this chapter. Nothing in this section requires the information provider to disclose information that it is otherwise prohibited from disclosing by law, except that a law that prohibits disclosing a person's information to third parties shall not be used to deny disclosure of such information to the victim under this section.

(2) Unless the information provider is otherwise willing to verify the victim's identification, the victim shall provide the following as proof of positive identification:

(a) The showing of a government-issued photo identification card or, if providing proof by mail, a copy of a government-issued photo identification card;

(b) A copy of a filed police report evidencing the victim's claim; and

(c) A written statement from the state patrol showing that the state patrol has on file documentation of the victim's identity pursuant to the personal identification procedures in RCW 43.43.760.

(3) The provider may require compensation for the reasonable cost of providing the information requested.

(4) No person, financial information repository, financial service provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association may be held liable for an action taken in good faith to provide information regarding potential or actual violations of this chapter to other financial information repositories, financial service providers, merchants, law enforcement authorities, victims, or any persons alleging to be a victim who comply with subsection (2) of this section which evidences the alleged victim's claim for the purpose of identification and prosecution of violators of this chapter, or to assist a victim in recovery of fines, restitution, rehabilitation of the victim's credit, or such other relief as may be appropriate.

(5) A person, financial information repository, financial service provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association may decline to provide information pursuant to this section when, in the exercise of good faith and reasonable judgment, it believes this section does not require disclosure of the information.

(6) Nothing in this section creates an obligation on the part of a person, financial information repository, financial services provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association to retain or maintain information or records that they are not otherwise required to retain or maintain in the ordinary course of its business.

(7) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this section are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. It is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW. The burden of proof in an action alleging a violation of this section shall be by a preponderance of the evidence, and the applicable statute of limitation shall be as set forth in RCW 19.182.120. For purposes of a judgment awarded pursuant to an action by a consumer under chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer shall be awarded actual damages. However, where there has been willful failure to comply with any requirement imposed under this section, the consumer shall be awarded actual damages, a monetary penalty of one thousand dollars, and the costs of the action together with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.

[ 2001 c 217 s 2.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.